Florida, session 2026, HB1341.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
56
57 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of section
58 20.165, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
59 20.165 Department of Business and Professional
60 Regulation.—There is created a Department of Business and
61 Professional Regulation.
62 (9)
63 (b) Each employee serving as a law enforcement officer for
64 the division must meet the qualifications for employment or
65 appointment as a law enforcement officer set forth under s.
66 943.13 and must be certified as a law enforcement officer by the
67 Department of Law Enforcement under chapter 943. Upon
68 certification, each law enforcement officer is subject to and
69 has the same authority as provided for law enforcement officers
70 generally in chapter 901 and has statewide jurisdiction. Each
71 officer also has arrest authority as provided for state law
72 enforcement officers in s. 901.15. Each officer possesses the
73 full law enforcement powers granted to other peace officers of
74 this state, including the authority to make arrests, carry
75 firearms, serve court process, and seize contraband and the
Page 3 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
76 proceeds of illegal activities.
77 1. The primary responsibility of each officer appointed
78 under this section is to investigate, enforce, and prosecute,
79 throughout the state, violations and violators of parts I and II
80 of chapter 210; chapter 310; chapter 326; parts I and III of
81 chapter 450; chapter 455; parts VI, VII, VIII, IX, XI, XII, XV,
82 and XVI of chapter 468; chapter 469; chapter 471; chapters 473-
83 477; chapter 481; parts I and II of chapter 489; chapter 499;
84 chapter 509; chapter 548; chapter 553;, part VII of chapter
85 559;, and chapters 561-569; chapters 718 and 719; chapter 721;
86 and chapter 723, and the rules adopted thereunder, as well as
87 other state laws that the division, all state law enforcement
88 officers, or beverage enforcement agents are specifically
89 authorized to enforce.
90 2. The secondary responsibility of each officer appointed
91 under this section is to enforce all other state laws, provided
92 that the enforcement is incidental to exercising the officer's
93 primary responsibility as provided in subparagraph 1., and the
94 officer exercises the powers of a deputy sheriff, only after
95 consultation or coordination with the appropriate local
96 sheriff's office or municipal police department or when the
97 division participates in the Florida Mutual Aid Plan during a
98 declared state emergency.
99 Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 448.095, Florida
100 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (2) of that section is
Page 4 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
101 republished, to read:
102 448.095 Employment eligibility.—
103 (2) EMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.—
104 (a) An employer shall verify each new employee's
105 employment eligibility within 3 business days after the first
106 day that the new employee begins working for pay as required
107 under 8 C.F.R. s. 274a.
108 (b)1. A public agency shall use the E-Verify system to
109 verify a new employee's employment eligibility as required under
110 paragraph (a).
111 2. Beginning on July 1, 2023, a private employer with 25
112 or more employees shall use the E-Verify system to verify a new
113 employee's employment eligibility as required under paragraph
114 (a).
115 3. Each employer required to use the E-Verify system under
116 this paragraph must certify on its first return each calendar
117 year to the tax service provider that it is in compliance with
118 this section when making contributions to or reimbursing the
119 state's unemployment compensation or reemployment assistance
120 system. An employer that voluntarily uses the E-Verify system
121 may also make such a certification on its first return each
122 calendar year in order to document such use.
123 (c) If the E-Verify system is unavailable for 3 business
124 days after the first day that the new employee begins working
125 for pay and an employer cannot access the system to verify a new
Page 5 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
126 employee's employment eligibility, the employer must use the
127 Employment Eligibility Verification form (Form I-9) to verify
128 employment eligibility. The unavailability of the E-Verify
129 system does not bar the employer from using the rebuttable
130 presumption established in paragraph (4)(a). An employer must
131 document the unavailability of the E-Verify system by retaining
132 a screenshot from each day which shows the employer's lack of
133 access to the system, a public announcement that the E-Verify
134 system is not available, or any other communication or notice
135 recorded by the employer regarding the unavailability of the
136 system.
137 (d) The employer must retain a copy of the documentation
138 provided and any official verification generated, if applicable,
139 for at least 3 years.
140 (e) An employer may not continue to employ an unauthorized
141 alien after obtaining knowledge that a person is or has become
142 an unauthorized alien.
143 (f) An employee leasing company licensed under part XI of
144 chapter 468 which enters into a written agreement or
145 understanding with a client company which places the primary
146 obligation for compliance with this section upon the client
147 company is not required to verify employment eligibility of any
148 new employees of the client company. In the absence of a written
149 agreement or understanding, the employee leasing company is
150 responsible for compliance with this section. Such employee
Page 6 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
151 leasing company shall, at all times, remain an employer as
152 otherwise defined in federal laws or regulations.
153 (3) ENFORCEMENT.—
154 (a) For the purpose of enforcement of this section, any of
155 the following persons or entities may request, and an employer
156 must provide, copies of any documentation relied upon by the
157 employer for the verification of a new employee's employment
158 eligibility:
159 1. The Department of Law Enforcement;
160 2. The Attorney General;
161 3. The state attorney in the circuit in which the new
162 employee works;
163 4. The statewide prosecutor; or
164 5. The Department of Commerce; or
165 6. The Department of Business and Professional Regulation.
166 (b) A person or an entity that makes a request under
167 paragraph (a) must rely upon the Federal Government to verify an
168 employee's employment eligibility and may not independently make
169 a final determination as to whether an employee is an
170 unauthorized alien.
171 (c) If the Department of Business and Professional
172 Regulation believes that an employer has violated subsection (2)
173 or s. 448.09, it must notify the Department of Commerce and the
174 Florida Department of Law Enforcement within 30 days after
175 making such determination.
Page 7 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
176 Section 3. Effective October 1, 2026, subsection (7) of
177 section 468.412, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
178 468.412 Talent agency regulations; prohibited acts.—
179 (7)(a) A No talent agency may not send or cause to be sent
180 any person as an employee to any house of ill fame, to any house
181 or place of amusement for immoral purposes, to any place
182 resorted to for the purposes of prostitution, to any place for
183 the modeling or photographing of a minor in the nude in the
184 absence of written permission from the minor's parents or legal
185 guardians, the character of which places the talent agency could
186 have ascertained upon reasonable inquiry. Any person who
187 violates this paragraph commits a misdemeanor of the first
188 degree.
189 (b) A talent agency may not send or cause to be sent any
190 minor to any house of ill fame, to any house or place of
191 amusement for immoral purpose, to any place resorted to for the
192 purpose of prostitution, the character of which places the
193 talent agency could have ascertained upon reasonable inquiry. A
194 talent agency may not send a minor to any place for the modeling
195 or photographing in the nude in the absence of written
196 permission from the minor's parents or legal guardians. Any
197 person who violates this paragraph commits a felony of the third
198 degree punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
199 Section 4. Subsection (3) of section 476.114, Florida
200 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (4), and a new subsection
Page 8 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
201 (3) is added to that section, to read:
202 476.114 Examination; prerequisites.—
203 (3) The board shall establish by rule minimum standards
204 for electronically reporting a student's course completion
205 records to the department and the penalties if a school or
206 program fails to adhere to the minimum standards adopted.
207 Penalties must include, but are not limited to, suspending the
208 school's or program's ability to report a student's course
209 completion records to the department. The department must report
210 all penalties imposed for failing to adhere to the minimum
211 standards for electronic reporting to the Department of
212 Education for further investigation and prosecution.
213 Section 5. Subsection (8) is added to section 477.019,
214 Florida Statutes, to read:
215 477.019 Cosmetologists; qualifications; licensure;
216 supervised practice; license renewal; endorsement; continuing
217 education.—
218 (8) The board shall establish by rule minimum standards
219 for electronically reporting a student's course completion
220 records to the department and the penalties if a school or
221 program fails to adhere to the minimum standards adopted.
222 Penalties must include, but are not limited to, suspending the
223 school's or program's ability to report a student's course
224 completion records to the department. The department must report
225 all penalties imposed for failing to adhere to the minimum
Page 9 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
226 standards for electronic reporting to the Department of
227 Education for further investigation and prosecution.
228 Section 6. Subsections (5) and (6) of section 477.0201,
229 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (6) and (7),
230 respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to that section,
231 to read:
232 477.0201 Specialty registration; qualifications;
233 registration renewal; endorsement.—
234 (5) The board shall establish by rule minimum standards
235 for electronically reporting a student's course completion
236 records to the department and the penalties if a school or
237 program fails to adhere to the minimum standards adopted.
238 Penalties must include, but are not limited to, suspending the
239 school's or program's ability to report a student's course
240 completion records to the department. The department must report
241 all penalties imposed for failing to adhere to the minimum
242 standards for electronic reporting to the Department of
243 Education for further investigation and prosecution.
244 Section 7. Subsection (1) of section 509.261, Florida
245 Statutes, is amended to read:
246 509.261 Revocation or suspension of licenses; fines;
247 procedure.—
248 (1) Any public lodging establishment or public food
249 service establishment that has operated or is operating in
250 violation of this chapter or the rules of the division,
Page 10 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
251 operating in violation of s. 581.217(7), operating without a
252 license, or operating with a suspended or revoked license may be
253 subject by the division to:
254 (a) Fines not to exceed $1,000 per offense;
255 (b) Mandatory completion, at personal expense, of a
256 remedial educational program administered by a food safety
257 training program provider approved by the division, as provided
258 in s. 509.049; and
259 (c) The suspension, revocation, or refusal of a license
260 issued pursuant to this chapter.
261 Section 8. Subsection (3) of section 559.79, Florida
262 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (4), and a new subsection
263 (3) is added to that section, to read:
264 559.79 Applications for license or renewal.—
265 (3)(a) For each application for a license or renewal of a
266 license, the Department of Business and Professional Regulation
267 may validate the applicant's identity and work authorization
268 status. As part of the validation process, the department is
269 authorized to request personal identification information from
270 the applicant, including, but not limited to, a social security
271 number; a passport, including visa information; a birth
272 certificate; immigration status; an alien registration number; a
273 Student and Exchange Visitor Information System identification
274 number; a naturalization or citizenship certificate number;
275 arrival and departure records; a permanent resident card;
Page 11 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
276 employment authorization documents; a certificate of
277 citizenship; a naturalization certificate; refugee travel
278 documents; or other state issued identification. The department
279 may submit an applicant's personal identification information to
280 the appropriate federal agencies for the purpose of validating
281 the applicant's identity or work authorization status. The
282 department may enter into memoranda of understanding with the
283 appropriate federal agencies to validate an applicant's identity
284 or work authorization status.
285 (b) The department must immediately suspend the license of
286 any licensee found not to have a work authorization status that
287 entitles the licensee to work in the United States. The
288 department shall reinstate the license, without an additional
289 charge to the licensee, upon verification from the appropriate
290 federal agencies that the licensee is authorized to work in the
291 United States.
292 (c) The department may not be held liable for any
293 licensure delay, denial, or suspension resulting from the
294 discharge of its duties under this subsection.
295 (d) The department may adopt rules to implement this
296 subsection.
297 Section 9. Section 569.006, Florida Statutes, is amended
298 to read:
299 569.006 Retail tobacco products dealers; administrative
300 penalties.—The division may suspend or revoke the permit of the
Page 12 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
301 dealer if the division determines or finds that upon sufficient
302 cause exists of a appearing of the violation of any of the
303 provisions of this chapter or a violation of the laws of this
304 state or any state or territory of the United States, including
305 part II of this chapter if the dealer deals, at retail, in
306 nicotine products within the state or allows a nicotine products
307 vending machine to be located on its premises within the state,
308 by a dealer or by a dealer's agent or employee. The division may
309 also assess and accept administrative fines of up to $1,000
310 against a dealer for each violation. The division shall deposit
311 all fines collected into the General Revenue Fund as collected.
312 An order imposing an administrative fine becomes effective 15
313 days after the date of the order. The division may suspend the
314 imposition of a penalty against a dealer, conditioned upon the
315 dealer's compliance with terms the division considers
316 appropriate.
317 Section 10. Section 11 of this act may be cited as "Meg's
318 Law."
319 Section 11. Effective October 1, 2026, section 569.24,
320 Florida Statutes, is created to read:
321 569.24 Prohibition on selling, furnishing, or giving
322 nitrous oxide; exceptions.—
323 (1) It is unlawful for any dealer who is licensed or
324 permitted under this chapter, or a dealer's agent or employee,
325 to possess, sell, possess with intent to sell, deliver, or give,
Page 13 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
326 directly or indirectly, nitrous oxide on or from the dealer's
327 licensed premises. A dealer or a dealer's agent or employee who
328 violates this subsection commits a felony of the third degree,
329 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
330 (2) This section does not apply to a grocery store or
331 supermarket, as licensed or permitted by the Department of
332 Agriculture and Consumer Services, but does apply to a
333 convenience business, as defined by s. 812.171.
334 (3) This section does not prohibit the purchase or sale of
335 a finished food product in which nitrous oxide is used solely as
336 a propellant, including aerosol whipped cream and alcoholic
337 whipped topping products.
338 (4) The Department of Business and Professional Regulation
339 shall adopt rules regarding the sale and purchase of nitrous
340 oxide to prevent the use of nitrous oxide for inducing a
341 condition of intoxication. Such rules may address products
342 containing nitrous oxide and finished food products in which
343 nitrous oxide is used solely as a propellant.
344 Section 12. Section 569.35, Florida Statutes, is amended
345 to read:
346 569.35 Retail nicotine product dealers; administrative
347 penalties.—The division may suspend or revoke the permit of a
348 dealer, including the retail tobacco products dealer permit of a
349 retail tobacco products dealer as defined in s. 569.002(4), if
350 the division determines or finds that upon sufficient cause
Page 14 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1341 2026
351 exists of a appearing of the violation of any of the provisions
352 of this part or a violation of the laws of this state or any
353 state or territory of the United States, by a dealer, or by a
354 dealer's agent or employee. The division may also assess and
355 accept an administrative fine of up to $1,000 against a dealer
356 for each violation. The division shall deposit all fines
357 collected into the General Revenue Fund as collected. An order
358 imposing an administrative fine becomes effective 15 days after
359 the date of the order. The division may suspend the imposition
360 of a penalty against a dealer, conditioned upon the dealer's
361 compliance with terms the division considers appropriate.
362 Section 13. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
363 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 15 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1341-00